New Jersey, session 222, A1904.
Be It Enacted by the Senate and the General Assembly of the State of New Jersey: 1.    In addition to the amounts appropriated under P.L.2021, c.133, the annual appropriations act for the fiscal year ending June 30, 2022, there is appropriated from the General Fund the following amount for the purpose specified: 54 DEPARTMENT OF HUMAN SERVICES 50 Economic Planning, Development, and Security 53 Economic Assistance and Security 7550 Division of Family Development STATE AID 15-7550  Income Maintenance Management ..$8,000,000 Total State Aid Appropriation, Division of Family Development ..... .$8,000,000 State Aid: 15   Work First New Jersey and Supplemental Security Income Burial Benefits Supplement ($8,000,000) Notwithstanding the maximum allowance for funeral, burial, and crematory services set forth in N.J.A.C.10:90-8.5 or any other law, rule, or regulation to the contrary, the amount appropriated for Work First New Jersey and Supplemental Security Income Burial Benefits Supplement shall be allocated to county and municipal agencies for the purposes of increasing the reimbursement level paid for funeral, burial, and crematory services provided to eligible persons pursuant to N.J.A.C.10:90-8.2 by $1,000 for each eligible person. Such appropriated funds shall not supplant other amounts allocated for the reimbursement of funeral, burial, and crematory services provided to eligible persons pursuant to N.J.A.C.10:90-8.2 that are included in appropriations under P.L.2021, c.133. 2.    This act shall take effect immediately.